California, session 20252026, AB1289.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 755 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:755. Any (a) A person placed on probation by the juvenile court or adjudged to be a ward of the juvenile court may be permitted by order of the court to reside in a county other than the county of his their legal residence, and the court shall retain jurisdiction such that person.Whenever(b) If a ward of the juvenile court is permitted to reside in a county other than the county of his their legal residence, he the ward may be placed under the supervision of the probation officer of the county of actual residence, with the consent of such the probation officer. The ward shall comply with the instructions of such the probation officer and upon failure to do so shall be returned to the county of his their legal residence for further hearing and order of the court.(c) This section applies to wards discharged to probation supervision pursuant to Section 875.